Oklahoma, session 2025, SB367.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2357.43, is

amended to read as follows:

Section 2357.43. For tax years beginning on or after January 1,

2022 year 2002 and subsequent tax years, there shall be allowed to a

resident individual or a part-year resident individual as a credit

against the tax imposed by Section 2355 of this title five percent

(5%) of the earned income tax credit allowed under Section 32 of the

Internal Revenue Code of the United States 1986, as amended, 26

U.S.C., Section 32, which for the taxable year beginning January 1,

2022, and the taxable year beginning each January 1 thereafter tax

years 2022 through 2025 shall be computed using the same

requirements, other than the five percent (5%) amount to compute the

Req. No. 1121 Page 1

cred it as prescribed by this section which shall remain constant, in

effect for computation of the earned income tax credit for federal

income tax purposes for the 2020 income tax year. However, this

credit shall not be paid in advance pursuant to the provisions of

Section 3507 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. For

tax years which begin on or after January 1, 2022 2002 through 2015

and tax year 2022 and subsequent tax years, if the credit exceeds

the tax imposed by Section 2355 of this title, the excess amount

shall be refunded to the taxpayer. The maximum earned income tax

credit allowable on the Oklahoma income tax return shall be prorated

on the ratio that Oklahoma adjusted gross income bears to the

federal adjusted gross income.

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.



60-1-1121 QD 1/14/2025 3:50:36 PM



















Req. No. 1121 Page 2